Nevada, session 83, SB57.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 289.830 is hereby amended to read as follows:
289.830 1. A law enforcement agency shall require
uniformed peace officers that it employs and who routinely interact
with the public to wear a portable event recording device while on
duty. Each law enforcement agency shall adopt policies and
procedures governing the use of portable event recording devices,
which must include, without limitation:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), requiring
activation of a portable event recording device whenever a peace
officer is responding to a call for service or at the initiation of any
other law enforcement or investigative encounter between a
uniformed peace officer and a member of the public;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), prohibiting
deactivation of a portable event recording device until the
conclusion of a law enforcement or investigative encounter;
(c) Prohibiting the recording of general activity;
(d) Protecting the privacy of persons:
(1) In a private residence;
(2) Seeking to report a crime or provide information
regarding a crime or ongoing investigation anonymously; or
(3) Claiming to be a victim of a crime;
(e) Requiring that any video recorded by a portable event
recording device must be retained by the law enforcement agency
for not less than 15 days; and
(f) Establishing disciplinary rules for peace officers who:
(1) Fail to operate a portable event recording device in
accordance with any departmental policies;
(2) Intentionally manipulate a video recorded by a portable
event recording device; or
(3) Prematurely erase a video recorded by a portable event
recording device.
2. Any record made by a portable event recording device
pursuant to this section is a public record which may be:
(a) Requested only on a per incident basis; and
-
*SB57*

– 3 –
(b) Available for inspection only at the location where the
record is held if the record contains confidential information that
may not otherwise be redacted.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Require any person possessing the powers of a peace
officer pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360, inclusive, to wear a
portable event recording device unless the peace officer is
employed by a law enforcement agency.
(b) Make any record made by a portable event recording device
which is not required to be worn pursuant to this section a public
record unless otherwise provided by specific statute.
(c) Apply the requirements of this section to a law enforcement
agency other than those described in subsection 4.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(1) The sheriff’s office of a county;
(2) A metropolitan police department;
(3) A police department of an incorporated city;
(4) A department, division or municipal court of a city or
town that employs marshals;
(5) The Nevada Highway Patrol; or
(6) A board of trustees of any county school district that
employs or appoints school police officers.
(b) “Portable event recording device” means a device issued to a
peace officer by a law enforcement agency to be worn on his or her
body and which records both audio and visual events occurring
during an encounter with a member of the public while performing
his or her duties as a peace officer.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB57*